Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 79. Alaska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act.

Sec. 21.79.010.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to protect, subject to certain limitations, the persons specified in AS

21.79.020(a)

against failure in the performance of contractual obligations under life, health, and annuity policies, plans, or contracts specified in AS

21.79.020(b)

because of the impairment or insolvency of the member insurer that issued the policies, plans, or contracts. To provide this protection, an association of member insurers is created under AS

21.79.040

to pay benefits and continue coverages as limited by this chapter, and members of the association are subject to assessment to provide funds to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am § 82 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 119 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in the first sentence, substituted “obligations under life, health, and annuity policies, plans, or contracts” for “obligations under life insurance and health insurance policies and annuity contracts”, inserted “, plans,” following “issued the policies”, and in the second sentence, inserted “member” following “an association of”.

Sec. 21.79.020.
Scope.

This chapter applies to a policy and contract specified in (b) of this section and to a person who

except for a nonresident certificate holder under a group policy or contract, is the beneficiary, assignee, or payee, including health care providers rendering services covered under health insurance policies or certificates, of a person described in (2) of this subsection; and

except in the case of an unallocated annuity contract or a structured settlement annuity, is the owner of, or a certificate holder or enrollee under, the policy or contract, and who

is a resident; or

is not a resident, if the following conditions are satisfied:

the member insurer that issued the policy or contract is domiciled in this state;

the state in which the person resides has an association similar to the association created by this chapter; and

the person is not eligible for coverage by an association in any other state due to the fact that the insurer, hospital or medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization was not licensed at the time specified in the guaranty association law of that state.

This chapter applies to a person specified in (a) of this section for a policy or contract of direct, nongroup life insurance, health insurance, annuity, and supplemental policy or contract, to a certificate under a direct group life, health, annuity, or supplemental policy or contract, to a subscriber’s contract issued by a hospital or medical service corporation under AS 21.87, to a subscriber’s contract issued by a health maintenance organization under AS 21.86, and to an unallocated annuity contract issued by a member insurer, except as otherwise limited by this chapter. In this subsection, “annuity policy or contract” or “certificate under a direct group life, health, annuity, or supplemental policy or contract” includes a guaranteed investment contract, a deposit administration contract, an unallocated funding agreement, an allocated funding agreement, a structured settlement annuity, an annuity issued to or in connection with a government lottery, and an immediate or deferred annuity contract.

This chapter does not apply to

that part of a policy or contract that is not guaranteed by the member insurer;

that part of the risk borne by the policy or contract owner;

a policy or contract of reinsurance, unless an assumption certificate has been issued;

that part of a policy or contract, except for part of a policy or contract, including a rider, that provides long-term care or other health insurance benefits, to the extent that the rate of interest on which it is based, or the interest rate, crediting rate, or similar factor determined by use of an index or other external reference stated in the policy or contract employed in calculating returns or changes in value,

averaged over the period of four years before the date on which the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under this chapter, whichever occurs first, exceeds the rate of interest determined by subtracting two percentage points from the published monthly average for that same four-year period or for a lesser period if the policy or contract was issued less than four years before the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under this chapter, whichever occurs first; and

on and after the date on which the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under this chapter, whichever occurs first, exceeds the rate of interest determined by subtracting three percentage points from the most recent published monthly average;

a portion of a policy or contract issued to a plan or program of an employer, association, or similar entity to provide life, health, or an annuity benefit to an employee, member, or other person, to the extent that the plan or program is self-funded or uninsured, including a benefit payable by the employer, association, or similar entity under

a multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined in 29 U.S.C. 1002 (Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974);

a minimum premium group insurance plan;

a stop-loss group insurance plan; or

an administrative services only contract;

that part of a policy or contract that provides a dividend or experience rating credit or voting rights, or provides that a fee or allowance be paid to a person, including the policy or contract owner, in connection with the service to or administration of the policy or contract;

a policy or contract issued in this state by a member insurer at a time when it was not licensed or did not have a certificate of authority to issue the policy or contract in this state;

a person who is a payee or beneficiary of a contract owner who is a resident of this state if the payee or beneficiary is provided coverage by the association of another state;

a person covered under (d) of this section if any coverage is provided by the association of another state to that person;

an unallocated annuity contract issued to or in connection with a benefit plan protected under the United States Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation, regardless of whether the United States Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation has become liable to make any payments with respect to the benefit plan;

that part of an unallocated annuity contract that is not issued to or in connection with a specific employee, union, or association of natural persons benefit plan or a government lottery;

that part of a policy or contract to the extent that assessments required by AS

21.79.070

with respect to the policy or contract are preempted by law;

an obligation that does not arise under the express written terms of the policy or contract issued by the member insurer to the enrollee, certificate holder, contract owner, or policy owner, including, without limitation,

a claim based on marketing materials;

a claim based on a side letter or other document that was issued by the member insurer without meeting applicable policy or contract form filing or approval requirements;

a misrepresentation of or regarding policy or contract benefits;

an extra contractual claim; or

a claim for penalties or consequential or incidental damages;

a contractual agreement that establishes the member insurer’s obligations to provide a book value accounting guaranty for defined contribution benefit plan participants by reference to a portfolio of assets that is owned by the benefit plan or its trustee, which, in each case, is not an affiliate of the member insurer;

that part of a policy or contract to the extent the part of the policy or contract provides for interest or other changes in value to be determined by the use of an index or other external reference stated in the policy or contract, but that have not been credited to the policy or contract, or as to which the policy or contract owner’s rights are subject to forfeiture, as of the date the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under this chapter, whichever is earlier; if a policy’s or contract’s interest or changes in value are credited less frequently than annually, then, for purposes of determining the values that have been credited and are not subject to forfeiture under this paragraph, the interest or change in value determined by using the procedures defined in the policy or contract shall be credited as if the contractual date of crediting interest or changing values was the date of impairment or insolvency, whichever is earlier, and will not be subject to forfeiture;

a policy or contract providing a hospital, medical, prescription drug, or other health care benefit in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1395w-21 — 1395w-154 or federal regulations adopted under those sections;

a person who acquires rights to receive payments through a structured settlement factoring transaction as defined in 26 U.S.C. 5891(c)(3)(A), regardless of whether the transaction occurred before, on, or after 26 U.S.C. 5891(c)(3)(A) became effective; or

structured settlement annuity benefits to which a payee or beneficiary has transferred the payee’s or beneficiary’s rights in a structured settlement factoring transaction as defined in 26 U.S.C. 5891(c)(3)(A), regardless of whether the transaction occurred before, on, or after 26 U.S.C. 5891(c)(3)(A) became effective.

This chapter, except for (a) of this section, applies to an unallocated annuity contract and shall provide coverage to a person who is the owner of

the unallocated annuity contract if the contract is issued to or in connection with a specific benefit plan whose plan sponsor has its principal place of business in this state; and

an unallocated annuity contract issued to or in connection with a government lottery if the owner is a resident.

This chapter, except for (a) of this section, applies to a structured settlement annuity and shall provide coverage to a person who is a payee under a structured settlement annuity, or the beneficiary of a payee if the payee is deceased, if the payee is

a resident, regardless of where the contract owner resides; or

not a resident, but only if both of the following conditions exist:

the contract owner of the structured settlement annuity is

a resident; or

not a resident, but the insurer that issued the structured settlement annuity is domiciled in this state, and the state in which the contract owner resides has an association similar to the association created by this chapter; and

the payee, or the payee’s beneficiary, and the contract owner are not eligible for coverage by the association of the state in which the payee or contract owner resides.

[Repealed, § 58 ch 47 SLA 2018.]

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am §§ 83, 84 ch 56 SLA 1996; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 119 SLA 2000; am §§ 2 — 6, 58 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (d) and (e) were enacted as (e) and (f); relettered in 2000.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (a), inserted “, including health care providers rendering services covered under health insurance policies or certificates,” following “or payee” in (a)(1), in the introductory language in (a)(2), inserted “or enrollee” following “certificate holder”, in (a)(2)(B)(i), inserted “member” near the beginning, and in (a)(2)(B)(3) inserted “, hospital or medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization” following “the insurer”, substituted “at the time specified in the guaranty association law of that state” for “as required by law in that state” following “was not licensed”; in (b), rewrote the first sentence, which read, “This chapter applies to a person specified in (a) of this section and to a direct, nongroup life, health annuity, and supplemental policy or contract, to a certificate under a direct group life, health, annuity, or supplemental policy or contract, and to an unallocated annuity contract issued by a member insurer, except as otherwise limited by this chapter.”, and added the second sentence; in (c), inserted “member” preceding “insurer” in (c)(1), substituted “contract owner” for “contract holder” in (c)(2), inserted “, except for part of a policy or contract, including a rider, that provides long-term care or other health insurance benefits,” following the first occurrence of “policy or contract” in (c)(4), added “a portion of a policy or contract issued to” at the beginning of (c)(5), and inserted “or other person,” preceding “to the extent” and made related changes, in (c)(6) and (8) substituted “contract owner” for “contract holder” following “contract”, in (c)(9), substituted “a person covered under (d)” for “a person covered under (e)” at the beginning, in (c)(10), inserted “benefit” preceding “plan protected”, in the introductory language in (c)(13), substituted “the member insurer to the enrollee, certificate holder, contract owner,” for “the insurer to the contract owner” following “issued by the”, in (c)(13)(B), inserted “member” preceding “insurer” and “or contract” following “policy”, in (c)(13)(c), inserted “or contract” following “policy”, added (c)(16) – (18), and made a related change; in the introductory language in (d) and (e), deleted “specified under (b) of this section” preceding “and shall provide”, made a stylistic change in (e)(2); repealed (f).

Sec. 21.79.025.
Liability limits.

The benefits for which the association may become liable may not exceed the lesser of

the contractual obligations for which the member insurer is liable or would have been liable if it were not an impaired or insolvent insurer;

with respect to any one life, regardless of the number of policies or contracts,

$300,000 in life insurance death benefits, but not more than $100,000 in net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values for life insurance;

for health insurance benefits,

$100,000 for coverage not defined as disability income insurance, health benefit plans, or long-term care insurance, including any net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values;

$300,000 for disability income insurance as defined in AS

21.12.052

and $300,000 for long-term care insurance as defined in AS

21.53.200

;

$500,000 for health benefit plans;

$250,000 in the present value of annuity benefits, including net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values;

with respect to either one contract owner provided coverage under AS

21.79.020(d)(2)

or one plan sponsor whose plan owns directly or in trust one or more unallocated annuity contracts not included in (4) of this subsection, $5,000,000 in unallocated annuity contract benefits, irrespective of the number of contracts held by that contract owner or plan sponsor except that, in the case of one or more unallocated annuity contracts that are covered under this chapter and that are owned by a trust or other entity for the benefit of two or more plan sponsors, coverage shall be provided by the association if the largest interest in the trust or entity owning the contract is held by a plan sponsor whose principal place of business is in this state; however, the association is not liable to cover more than $5,000,000 in benefits, regardless of the number of policies and contracts held by the owner;

with respect to an individual participating in a governmental retirement benefit plan established under 26 U.S.C. 401, 26 U.S.C. 403(b), or 26 U.S.C. 457 and covered by an unallocated annuity contract, or to a beneficiary of the individual if the individual is deceased, in the aggregate, $250,000 in present-value annuity benefits, including net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values; or

with respect to each payee of a structured settlement annuity, or beneficiary of the payee if the payee is deceased, $250,000 in present-value annuity benefits in the aggregate, including net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values, if any.

The limitations imposed under this section are limitations on the benefits for which the association is obligated before taking into account either its subrogation and assignment rights or the extent to which those benefits could be provided out of the assets of an impaired or insolvent insurer attributable to covered policies. The costs of the association’s obligations under this chapter may be met by the use of assets attributable to covered policies or reimbursed to the association under its subrogation and assignment rights.

In providing coverage required under AS

21.79.060

, the association may not be required to guarantee, assume, reissue, reinsure, or perform, or cause to be guaranteed, assumed, reissued, reinsured, or performed, the contractual obligations of an insolvent or impaired insurer under a covered policy or contract when the obligations do not materially affect the economic values or economic benefits of the covered policy or contract.

The association may not be required to cover more than

an aggregate of $300,000 in benefits with respect to any one life under (a)(2), (4), and (5) of this section, except that, with respect to benefits for health benefit plans under (a)(2)(B) of this section, the aggregate liability of the association may not exceed $500,000 for any one individual; or

$5,000,000 in benefits with respect to one owner of multiple nongroup policies of life insurance, whether the policy or contract owner is an individual, firm, corporation, or other person, and whether the persons insured are officers, managers, employees, or other persons, regardless of the number of policies and contracts held by the owner.

For purposes of this chapter, benefits provided by a long-term care rider to a life insurance policy or annuity contract will be considered the same type of benefits as the base life insurance policy or annuity contract to which the rider relates.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am § 85 ch 56 SLA 1996; am §§ 5, 6 ch 119 SLA 2000; am § 87 ch 23 SLA 2011; am §§ 7 — 10 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (a), inserted “member” preceding the first occurrence of “insurer” in (a)(1), rewrote (a)(2)(B), near the beginning of (a)(3), substituted “either one contract owner provided coverage under AS

21.79.020(d)(2)

or one plan sponsor” for “any one contract holder or plan sponsor”, substituted “contract owner” for “contract holder” following “held by that contract”, and substituted “, regardless of the number of policies and contracts held by the owner” for “with respect to an unallocated annuity contract not included in (4) of this subsection” at the end, in (a)(4) and (5) substituted “$250,000” for “$100,000”; in (c), inserted “reissue,” following “assume,” and “reissued,” following “assumed,”; in (d), substituted “health benefit plans” for “basic hospital, medical, and surgical insurance or major medical insurance” following “with respect to benefits for” in (d)(1), and, in (d)(2) substituted “one owner of” for “one owner or” following “with respect to” and inserted “or contract” following “whether the policy”; added (e).

Sec. 21.79.030.
Construction.

This chapter shall be construed to achieve the purposes set out in AS

21.79.010

.

This chapter is intended to provide coverage to a person who is a resident of this state and, in special circumstances, to a nonresident. In order to avoid duplicate coverage, if a person who would otherwise receive coverage under this chapter is provided coverage under the law of any other state, the person may not be provided coverage under this chapter. In determining the application of the provisions of this subsection, in situations where a person could be covered by the association of more than one state, whether as an owner, payee, beneficiary, or assignee, this chapter shall be construed in conjunction with other state laws to result in coverage by only one association.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am §§ 7, 8 ch 119 SLA 2000)

Sec. 21.79.040.
Association established.

There is established as a nonprofit legal entity the Alaska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association. Each member insurer shall be a member of the association as a condition of the insurer’s authority to transact insurance, a hospital or medical service corporation business, or a health maintenance organization business in this state. The association shall perform its functions under a plan of operation established and approved under AS

21.79.080

and shall exercise its powers through the Board of Governors established under AS

21.79.050

. For purposes of administration and assessment, the association shall maintain the following accounts:

the health account; and

the life insurance and annuity account, including the following subaccounts:

life insurance account;

annuity account that must include annuity contracts owned by a governmental retirement benefit plan, or its trustee, qualified under 26 U.S.C. 401, 26 U.S.C. 403(b), or 26 U.S.C. 457 (Internal Revenue Code), but that otherwise excludes unallocated annuities; and

unallocated annuity account that must exclude contracts owned by a governmental retirement benefit plan, or its trustee, qualified under 26 U.S.C. 401, 26 U.S.C. 403(b), or 26 U.S.C. 457 (Internal Revenue Code).

The association is under the supervision of the director and is subject to the insurance laws of the state. Except as provided in AS

21.79.110(b)

, meetings or records of the association may be open to the public upon majority vote of the Board of Governors of the association.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am § 86 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 119 SLA 2000; am § 10 ch 38 SLA 2007; am § 11 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in the introductory language in (a), inserted “, a hospital or medical service corporation business, or a health maintenance organization business” following “to transact insurance”, and deleted “insurance” following “the health” in (a)(1).

Sec. 21.79.050.
Board of governors.

The Board of Governors of the association consists of not less than seven nor more than 11 representatives of member insurers. The director may appoint two individuals as members of the board to represent the public. Terms of office for board members shall be established in the plan of operation submitted under AS

21.79.080

. Member insurers shall select the insurer board members, subject to the approval of the director. A vacancy in a board membership held by an insurer member shall be filled for the unexpired term by a majority vote of the remaining board members, subject to the approval of the director. A vacancy in a board membership held by a representative of the public shall be filled by the director. A board member who represents the public may not be an officer, director, or employee of an insurer, hospital or medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization and may not be engaged in the business of insurance.

Before the director approves the selection of an insurer board member, the director shall consider whether all member insurers are fairly represented on the board.

A board member is not entitled to compensation by the association. However, a board member may be reimbursed from the assets of the association for expenses incurred while performing duties as a member of the board.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am §§ 10, 11 ch 119 SLA 2000; am § 12 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “not less than seven nor more than 11 representatives” for “not less than five nor more than nine representatives”, and in the last sentence, inserted “, hospital or medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization” following “employee of an insurer”.